Vermont, session 2025-2026, H171.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. OFFICER-INVOLVED SHOOTING PROTOCOL
(a) The General Assembly finds it is in the best interests of victims and law
enforcement officers to efficiently and thoroughly conduct independent
investigations of any officer-involved shooting (OIS) in Vermont. It is the
intent of the General Assembly to facilitate cooperation amongst the entities
responsible for investigating an OIS so there is a well-understood protocol for
addressing an OIS that instills public trust in such investigations and resolves
investigations in a timely manner to provide certainty to all parties involved.
(b) The Attorney General’s Office (AGO), the Department of State’s
Attorneys and Sheriffs (DSAS), the Department of Public Safety, and the
Vermont Association of Chiefs of Police shall work collaboratively to identify
a protocol and best practices for independent investigations of an OIS.
(c) A protocol for interagency cooperation in an OIS investigation shall:
(1) define “officer-involved shooting” and what types of incidents
trigger an investigation;
(2) define “conflict of interest” and identify the appropriate steps to
manage any conflicts for law enforcement and prosecutors;
VT LEG #390158 v.1

No. 115 Page 2 of 2
2026
(3) delineate the process for informing the AGO and DSAS of an OIS;
(4) identify the general steps for law enforcement investigations into an
OIS;
(5) describe the process for prosecutorial assessment of the investigative
materials, including dual independent assessments and the role of victim
advocates;
(6) evaluate the process of investigation and prosecutorial review of an
OIS to ensure timely criminal charging determinations, and identify and
address existing barriers to timely criminal charging determinations; and
(7) outline the final outcome of an investigation and assessment of an
OIS, such as clearing a law enforcement officer or filing criminal charges.
(d) To inform their efforts to develop a protocol, the entities shall examine
other jurisdictions’ protocols for an OIS investigation to determine best
practices.
(e) On or before December 1, 2026, the entities shall submit one written
report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary detailing their work,
an agreed-upon protocol for an OIS investigation, and any legislative changes
necessary, including appropriations, to effectuate the protocol.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 8, 2026
VT LEG #390158 v.1